Florida, session 2026F, SB4F.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âParagraphs (l) and (m) of subsection (8) of 30 section 200.001, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 31 200.001âMillages; definitions and general provisions.â 32 (8) 33 (l)ââMaximum total county ad valorem taxes leviedâ means 34 the total taxes levied by a county, municipal service taxing 35 units of that county, and special districts dependent to that 36 county at their individual maximum millages, authorized 37 calculated pursuant to s. 200.065(5)(a) for fiscal years 2009 38 2010 and thereafter. 39 (m)ââMaximum total municipal ad valorem taxes leviedâ means 40 the total taxes levied by a municipality and special districts 41 dependent to that municipality at their individual maximum 42 millages, authorized calculated pursuant to s. 200.065(5)(a) s. 43 200.065(5)(b) for fiscal years 2009-2010 and thereafter. 44 Section 2.âSubsection (5) of section 200.065, Florida 45 Statutes, is amended to read: 46 200.065âMethod of fixing millage.â 47 (5)âIn each fiscal year: 48 (a)âThe maximum millage rate that a county, municipality, 49 special district dependent to a county or municipality, 50 municipal service taxing unit, or independent special district 51 may levy is the a rolled-back rate computed pursuant to 52 subsection (1) based on the amount of taxes which would have 53 been levied in the prior year if the maximum millage rate had 54 been applied, adjusted for change in per capita Florida personal 55 income, unless a higher rate was adopted, in which case the 56 maximum is the adopted rate. The maximum millage rate applicable 57 to a county authorized to levy a county public hospital surtax 58 under s. 212.055 and which did so in fiscal year 2007 shall 59 exclude the revenues required to be contributed to the county 60 public general hospital in the current fiscal year for the 61 purposes of making the maximum millage rate calculation, but 62 shall be added back to the maximum millage rate allowed after 63 the roll back has been applied, the total of which shall be 64 considered the maximum millage rate for such a county for 65 purposes of this subsection. The revenue required to be 66 contributed to the county public general hospital for the 67 upcoming fiscal year shall be calculated as 11.873 percent times 68 the millage rate levied for countywide purposes in fiscal year 69 2007 times 95 percent of the preliminary tax roll for the 70 upcoming fiscal year. A higher rate may be adopted only under 71 the following conditions: 72 1.âA rate of not more than 110 percent of the rolled-back 73 rate based on the previous yearâs maximum millage rate, adjusted 74 for change in per capita Florida personal income, may be adopted 75 if approved by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the 76 governing body of the county, municipality, or independent 77 district; or 78 2.âA rate in excess of 110 percent may be adopted if 79 approved by a unanimous vote of the membership of the governing 80 body of the county, municipality, or independent district or by 81 a three-fourths vote of the membership of the governing body if 82 the governing body has nine or more members, or if the rate is 83 approved by a referendum. 84 (b)âThe millage rate of a county or municipality, municipal 85 service taxing unit of that county, and any special district 86 dependent to that county or municipality may exceed the maximum 87 millage rate authorized calculated pursuant to this subsection 88 if the total county ad valorem taxes levied or total municipal 89 ad valorem taxes levied do not exceed the maximum total county 90 ad valorem taxes levied or maximum total municipal ad valorem 91 taxes levied, respectively. Voted millage and taxes levied by a 92 municipality or independent special district that has levied ad 93 valorem taxes for less than 5 years are not subject to this 94 limitation. The millage rate of a county authorized to levy a 95 county public hospital surtax under s. 212.055 may exceed the 96 maximum millage rate authorized calculated pursuant to this 97 subsection to the extent necessary to account for the revenues 98 required to be contributed to the county public hospital. Total 99 taxes levied may exceed the maximum calculated pursuant to 100 subsection (6) as a result of an increase in taxable value above 101 that certified in subsection (1) if such increase is less than 102 the percentage amounts contained in subsection (6) or if the 103 administrative adjustment cannot be made because the value 104 adjustment board is still in session at the time the tax roll is 105 extended; otherwise, millage rates subject to this subsection 106 may be reduced so that total taxes levied do not exceed the 107 maximum. 108 109 Any unit of government operating under a home rule charter 110 adopted pursuant to ss. 10, 11, and 24, Art. VIII of the State 111 Constitution of 1885, as preserved by s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the 112 State Constitution, which is granted the authority in the State 113 Constitution to exercise all the powers conferred now or 114 hereafter by general law upon municipalities and which exercises 115 such powers in the unincorporated area shall be recognized as a 116 municipality under this subsection. For a downtown development 117 authority established before the effective date of the State 118 Constitution which has a millage that must be approved by a 119 municipality, the governing body of that municipality shall be 120 considered the governing body of the downtown development 121 authority for purposes of this subsection. 122 Section 3.âSection 200.068, Florida Statutes, is amended to 123 read: 124 200.068âCertification of compliance with this chapter.âNot 125 later than 30 days following adoption of an ordinance or 126 resolution establishing a property tax levy, each taxing 127 authority shall certify compliance with the provisions of this 128 chapter to the Department of Revenue. In addition to a statement 129 of compliance, such certification shall include a copy of the 130 ordinance or resolution so adopted; a copy of the certification 131 of value showing rolled-back millage and proposed millage rates, 132 as provided to the property appraiser pursuant to s. 200.065(1) 133 and (2)(b); maximum millage rates authorized calculated pursuant 134 to s. 200.065(5), together with values and calculations upon 135 which the maximum millage rates are based; and a certified copy 136 of the advertisement, as published pursuant to s. 200.065(3). In 137 certifying compliance, the governing body of the county shall 138 also include a certified copy of the notice required under s. 139 194.037. However, if the value adjustment board completes its 140 hearings after the deadline for certification under this 141 section, the county shall submit such copy to the department not 142 later than 30 days following completion of such hearings. 143 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 144 made by this act to section 200.065, Florida Statutes, in a 145 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 218.12, Florida 146 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 147 218.12âAppropriations to offset reductions in ad valorem 148 tax revenue in fiscally constrained counties.â 149 (2)âOn or before November 15 of each year, each fiscally 150 constrained county shall apply to the Department of Revenue to 151 participate in the distribution of the appropriation and provide 152 documentation supporting the countyâs estimated reduction in ad 153 valorem tax revenue in the form and manner prescribed by the 154 Department of Revenue. The documentation must include an 155 estimate of the reduction in taxable value directly attributable 156 to revisions of Art. VII of the State Constitution for all 157 county taxing jurisdictions within the county and shall be 158 prepared by the property appraiser in each fiscally constrained 159 county. The documentation must also include the county millage 160 rates applicable in all such jurisdictions for both the current 161 year and the prior year; rolled-back rates, determined as 162 provided in s. 200.065, for each county taxing jurisdiction; and 163 maximum millage rates that could have been levied by majority 164 vote pursuant to s. 200.065(5). For purposes of this section, 165 each fiscally constrained countyâs reduction in ad valorem tax 166 revenue shall be calculated as 95 percent of the estimated 167 reduction in taxable value times the lesser of the 2007 168 applicable millage rate or the applicable millage rate for each 169 county taxing jurisdiction in the current year. If a fiscally 170 constrained county fails to apply for the distribution, its 171 share shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was 172 made. 173 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 174 made by this act to section 200.065, Florida Statutes, in a 175 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 218.125, Florida 176 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 177 218.125âOffset for tax loss associated with certain 178 constitutional amendments affecting fiscally constrained 179 counties.â 180 (2)âOn or before November 15 of each year, each fiscally 181 constrained county shall apply to the Department of Revenue to 182 participate in the distribution of the appropriation and provide 183 documentation supporting the countyâs estimated reduction in ad 184 valorem tax revenue in the form and manner prescribed by the 185 Department of Revenue. The documentation must include an 186 estimate of the reduction in taxable value directly attributable 187 to revisions of Art. VII of the State Constitution for all 188 county taxing jurisdictions within the county and shall be 189 prepared by the property appraiser in each fiscally constrained 190 county. The documentation must also include the county millage 191 rates applicable in all such jurisdictions for the current year 192 and the prior year, rolled-back rates determined as provided in 193 s. 200.065 for each county taxing jurisdiction, and maximum 194 millage rates that could have been levied by majority vote 195 pursuant to s. 200.065(5). For purposes of this section, each 196 fiscally constrained countyâs reduction in ad valorem tax 197 revenue shall be calculated as 95 percent of the estimated 198 reduction in taxable value multiplied by the lesser of the 2010 199 applicable millage rate or the applicable millage rate for each 200 county taxing jurisdiction in the current year. If a fiscally 201 constrained county fails to apply for the distribution, its 202 share shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was 203 made. 204 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 205 made by this act to section 200.065, Florida Statutes, in a 206 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 218.136, Florida 207 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 208 218.136âOffset for ad valorem revenue loss affecting 209 fiscally constrained counties.â 210 (2)âOn or before November 15 of each year, each fiscally 211 constrained county shall apply to the Department of Revenue to 212 participate in the distribution of the appropriation and provide 213 documentation supporting the countyâs estimated reduction in ad 214 valorem tax revenue in the form and manner prescribed by the 215 Department of Revenue. The documentation must include an 216 estimate of the reduction in taxable value directly attributable 217 to revisions of s. 6(a), Art. VII of the State Constitution 218 approved in the November 2024 general election for all county 219 taxing jurisdictions within the county and shall be prepared by 220 the property appraiser in each fiscally constrained county. The 221 documentation must also include the county millage rates 222 applicable in all such jurisdictions for the current year and 223 the prior year, rolled-back rates determined as provided in s. 224 200.065 for each county taxing jurisdiction, and maximum millage 225 rates that could have been levied by majority vote pursuant to 226 s. 200.065(5). For purposes of this section, each fiscally 227 constrained countyâs reduction in ad valorem tax revenue shall 228 be calculated as 95 percent of the estimated reduction in 229 taxable value multiplied by the lesser of the 2024 applicable 230 millage rate or the applicable millage rate for each county 231 taxing jurisdiction in the current year. If a fiscally 232 constrained county fails to apply for the distribution, its 233 share shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was 234 made. 235 Section 7.âNotwithstanding s. 101.161(3)(a), Florida 236 Statutes, a ballot summary may exceed 75 words for a joint 237 resolution proposing an amendment or a revision to ss. 4, 6, and 238 9, Article VII of the State Constitution which is to be 239 submitted to the electors at the general election to be held on 240 November 3, 2026. 241 Section 8.âIf any law amended by this act was also amended 242 by a law enacted during the 2026 Regular Session or 2026 Special 243 Session E of the Legislature, such laws shall be construed as if 244 they had been enacted during the same session of the Legislature 245 and full effect shall be given to each if possible. 246 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.